Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 881.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Electricians’ Licensing Board created under this chapter.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety.

“Complex structure” shall have the same meaning as the term “public building” as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2900(8)

.

“Electrical inspector” means a State electrical inspector employed pursuant to section 915 of this title.

“Electrical installation” means wires, fixtures, or apparatus installed in a complex structure or at the construction site of such structure for the transmission and use of commercially supplied or privately generated electrical energy.

“Electrician’s helper” means a person assisting in the construction, installation, or repair of an electrical installation under the direct supervision of a master or journeyman electrician who is present at the work site.

“Legislative body” means the selectboard of a town, the board of aldermen or city council of a city, or the board of trustees of an incorporated village.

“Municipal inspector” means an electrical inspector authorized to conduct municipal inspections pursuant to section 898 of this title.

“Registered apprentice” means an apprentice registered with the Apprenticeship Division of the State Department of Labor for electrical training.

“Work notice” means the notice required to be filed under this chapter by an electrician prior to commencement of electrical work.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 63

, § 76, eff. June 11, 2003;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 10a, eff. April 1, 2005;

2005, No. 8

, § 8, eff. April 25, 2005;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 882.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

The construction, installation, operation, repair, or maintenance of electrical installations that are used by a public utility in rendering its authorized service; nor to the installation, operation, repair, and wiring associated with telecommunication services and equipment used for the transmission of information by electricity regardless of the location of such electrical installations, equipment, or facilities.

Electrical installations in ships, pipeline systems, railway rolling stock, automotive equipment, or portable sound equipment.

The manufacture, testing, or repair of electrical equipment in the plant of the manufacturer of the equipment.

The construction, repairs, or maintenance of buildings used exclusively for agricultural purposes on owner-occupied farms.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1983, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 11, 1984;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.